Hawaii statutes.
[§256B-2] Hawaii ABLE savings program; establishment.
The director of finance shall establish the Hawaii ABLE savings program to
provide for individual savings accounts that empower individuals with a
disability and their families to save private funds to support the individual
with a disability. [L 2015, c 206, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next